Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-407
Governing law.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, the law of the jurisdiction in which a partnership has its chief executive office governs relations among the partners and between the partners and the partnership.

(2) The law of this state governs relations among the partners and between the partners and the partnership and the liability of partners for an obligation of a limited liability partnership.

Laws 1997, LB 523, § 7.